lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/7.twolc
!! Twolc


Alphabet
a b c d e f g h i j k
l m n o p q r s t u v
w x y z å ä ö %>:0
%^A:ä %^O:ö %^U:y
;


Sets

Vow = a e o u i y ä ö ;
Backvowel = a o u ;



Rules

"Astevaihtelu WeakGrade t:d"
t:d <=> Vow _ Vow %^WG:0 ;
! t:d ! ruoto:ruodon 


"Astevaihtelu WeakGrade lt:ll, rt:rr"
t:cy <=> Vow cy _ Vow %^WG:0  ;
where cy in ( l n r ) ;
        
! silta^WG>n
! silla00n
! parta^WG>n
! parra00n
! kunta^WG>n
! kunna00n


"Vokaalisointu"
vx:vy <=> Backvowel :* _ ;
where vx in (%^A %^O %^U) 
	vy in (a o u)
	matched ; 
